Massachusetts, session 194th, H3780.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts department 
of transportation, in consultation with the executive office of public safety and security, shall 
adopt and implement a program to prevent and mitigate the effects of wrong-way driving on 
limited-access roadways under the commonwealth’s jurisdiction. The program may include, 
without limitation, installation of new highway safety technology, a plan of capital 
improvements, and changes to highway design and traffic control device guidelines. The details 
of the program, including a projected budget and a schedule setting forth the dates by which the 
safety measures shall be implemented, shall be filed with the house and senate committees on 
ways and means and the house and senate co-chairs of the joint committee on transportation and 
made publicly available on the department’s web site not later than June 30, 2026.